Utah statutes.
53C-5-103.   Control of noxious weeds, new and invading plant species,
insects, and disease infestations.
The director may enter into agreements with other public agencies and private
landowners to cooperate in the control of noxious weeds, new and invading
plant species, insects, and disease infestations on state-owned and adjacent
lands.
